District of Columbia statutes.
6-1203

Board of Review established.

In carrying out the purpose of this chapter, the Commission of Fine Arts is hereby authorized to appoint a committee of 3 architects, who shall serve as a Board of Review without expense to the United States and who shall advise the Commission of Fine Arts, in writing, regarding designs and plans referred to it.

Sept. 22, 1950, 64 Stat. 904, ch. 984, § 3
1981 Ed., § 5-1103.
1973 Ed., § 5-803.